Colorado statutes. TITLE 19 Children's Code
ARTICLE 2.5
THE COLORADO JUVENILE JUSTICE SYSTEM

Editor's note:
This article 2.5 was added with relocations in 2021. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated. For a detailed comparison of this article 2.5, see the comparative tables
located in the back of the index.

Section

PART 1 GENERAL PROVISIONS

PART 2 INVESTIGATIONS AND LAW ENFORCEMENT

PART 3 DETENTION

PART 4 DIVERSION

PART 5 INITIATION OF PROCEEDINGS

PART 6 COURT PROCEEDINGS

PART 7 COMPETENCY TO PROCEED

PART 8 DIRECT FILING AND TRANSFER HEARINGS

PART 9 ADJUDICATORY PROCEEDINGS

PART 10 TEEN COURTS

PART 11 SENTENCING

SUBPART A IN GENERAL

SUBPART B OFFENSE-SPECIFIC SPECIALIZED SENTENCING

SUBPART C SENTENCING - SPECIAL OFFENDERS

PART 12 JUVENILE PAROLE

PART 13 APPEALS

PART 14 ADMINISTRATION

SUBPART A IN GENERAL

SUBPART B PROGRAMS

PART 15 FACILITIES

SUBPART A IN GENERAL

SUBPART B BEDS AND FACILITIES

SUBPART C FACILITIES - COMMITMENT